Florida, session 2026, HB805.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
57
58 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Veterinary
59 Workforce Innovation Act."
60 Section 2. Section 474.201, Florida Statutes, is amended
61 to read:
62 474.201 Legislative findings, intent, and purpose.—
63 (1) The Legislature finds that the practice of veterinary
64 medicine is potentially dangerous to the public health and
65 safety if conducted by incompetent and unlicensed practitioners.
66 The legislative purpose in enacting this chapter is to ensure
67 that every veterinarian practicing in this state meet minimum
68 requirements for safe practice. It is the legislative intent
69 that veterinarians who are not normally competent or who
70 otherwise present a danger to the public must shall be
71 disciplined or prohibited from practicing in this state.
72 (2) The Legislature finds that the practice of educated,
73 trained, and experienced veterinary professional associates,
74 veterinary technicians, and veterinary technologists will
75 increase consumer access to high-quality veterinary medical
Page 3 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
76 services at a reasonable cost to consumers, while also
77 increasing the efficiency of the practice of veterinary medicine
78 in this state.
79 Section 3. Present subsection (14) of section 474.202,
80 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (17), and a new
81 subsection (14) and subsections (15) and (16) are added to that
82 section, to read:
83 474.202 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
84 (14) "Veterinary professional associate" means an
85 individual who has graduated with a master's degree or the
86 equivalent in veterinary clinical care from an accredited
87 institution and who meets the requirements to be registered by
88 the department.
89 (15) "Veterinary technician" or "veterinary technologist"
90 means an individual who has graduated from an accredited
91 veterinary technology program and who meets the requirements to
92 be registered by the department. The term also includes a
93 veterinary nurse.
94 (16) "Veterinary technology" includes, with respect to
95 animals, the provision of medical care, monitoring, and
96 treatment of a veterinary patient by a person who is a
97 registered veterinary technician or technologist working under
98 supervision of a licensed veterinarian as authorized under this
99 chapter. The term includes veterinary nursing.
100 Section 4. Subsection (4) of section 474.2021, Florida
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
101 Statutes, is amended to read:
102 474.2021 Veterinary telehealth.—
103 (4) A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth:
104 (a) May not engage in the practice of veterinary
105 telehealth unless it is within the context of a
106 veterinarian/client/patient relationship;
107 (b) Shall practice in a manner consistent with his or her
108 scope of practice and the prevailing professional standard of
109 practice for a veterinarian who provides in-person veterinary
110 services to patients in this state and shall employ sound,
111 professional judgment to determine whether using veterinary
112 telehealth is an appropriate method for delivering medical
113 advice or treatment to the patient;
114 (c) May use veterinary telehealth to perform an initial
115 patient evaluation to establish the veterinarian/client/patient
116 relationship if the evaluation is conducted using synchronous,
117 audiovisual communication. The evaluation may not be performed
118 using audio-only communications, text messaging, questionnaires,
119 chatbots, or other similar means. If a veterinarian practicing
120 telehealth conducts a patient evaluation sufficient to diagnose
121 and treat the patient, the veterinarian is not required to
122 research a patient's medical history or conduct a physical
123 examination of the patient before using veterinary telehealth to
124 provide a veterinary health care service to the patient;
125 (d) If the initial patient evaluation is performed using
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
126 veterinary telehealth, must provide the client with a statement
127 containing the veterinarian's name, license number, and contact
128 information and the contact information for at least one
129 physical veterinary clinic in the vicinity of the patient's
130 location and instructions for how to receive patient follow-up
131 care or assistance if the veterinarian and client are unable to
132 communicate because of a technological or equipment failure or
133 if there is an adverse reaction to treatment, and inform the
134 client that, if medication is prescribed, the client may obtain
135 a prescription that may be filled at the pharmacy of his or her
136 choice. The veterinarian shall obtain from the client a signed
137 and dated statement indicating the client has received the
138 required information before practicing veterinary telehealth;
139 (e) Shall prescribe all drugs and medications in
140 accordance with all federal and state laws and the following
141 requirements:
142 1. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may
143 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs
144 specifically approved for use in animals by the United States
145 Food and Drug Administration, the use of which conforms to the
146 approved labeling. Prescriptions based solely on a telehealth
147 evaluation may be issued for up to 6 months 1 month for products
148 labeled solely for flea and tick control and up to 30 14 days of
149 treatment for other animal drugs. Prescriptions based solely on
150 a telehealth evaluation may not be renewed without an in-person
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
151 examination.
152 2. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not
153 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs as
154 defined in s. 465.003 approved by the United States Food and
155 Drug Administration for human use or compounded antibacterial,
156 antifungal, antiviral, or antiparasitic medications, unless the
157 veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical examination of
158 the animal or made medically appropriate and timely visits to
159 the premises where the animal is kept.
160 3. A veterinarian may not use veterinary telehealth to
161 prescribe a controlled substance as defined in chapter 893
162 unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical
163 examination of the animal or made medically appropriate and
164 timely visits within the past year to the premises where the
165 animal is kept.
166 4. A veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not
167 prescribe a drug or other medication for use on a horse engaged
168 in racing or training at a facility under the jurisdiction of
169 the Florida Gaming Control Commission or on a horse that is a
170 covered horse as defined in the federal Horseracing Integrity
171 and Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 3051 et seq.;
172 (f) Shall be familiar with available veterinary resources,
173 including emergency resources, near the patient's location and
174 be able to provide the client with a list of nearby
175 veterinarians who may be able to see the patient in person upon
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
176 the request of the client;
177 (g) Shall keep, maintain, and make available a summary of
178 the patient record as provided in s. 474.2165; and
179 (h) May not use veterinary telehealth to issue an
180 international or interstate travel certificate or a certificate
181 of veterinary inspection.
182 Section 5. Subsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection
183 (5), and subsection (7) of section 474.203, Florida Statutes,
184 are amended to read:
185 474.203 Exemptions.—This chapter does not apply to:
186 (3) A student in a school or college of veterinary
187 medicine or a program for veterinary technology while in the
188 performance of duties assigned by her or his instructor or when
189 working as a preceptor under the immediate supervision of a
190 licensee, if such preceptorship is required for graduation from
191 an accredited school or college of veterinary medicine or
192 program for veterinary technology. The licensed veterinarian is
193 responsible for all acts performed by a preceptor under her or
194 his supervision.
195 (5)(a) Any person, or the person's regular employee,
196 administering to the ills or injuries of her or his own animals,
197 including, but not limited to, castration, spaying, and
198 dehorning of herd animals, unless title is transferred or
199 employment provided for the purpose of circumventing this law.
200 This exemption does not apply to any person licensed as a
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
201 veterinarian or registered as a veterinary professional
202 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist in
203 another state or foreign jurisdiction and practicing temporarily
204 in this state. However, except as provided in s. 474.2126 or s.
205 828.30, only a veterinarian may immunize or treat an animal for
206 diseases that are communicable to humans and that are of public
207 health significance.
208 (7) Any veterinary aide, nurse, laboratory technician,
209 preceptor, or assistant; any registered veterinary professional
210 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist,
211 registered pursuant to s. 474.2126; or other employee of a
212 licensed veterinarian who administers medication or who renders
213 auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible
214 supervision of a licensed veterinarian, including those tasks
215 identified by rule of the board requiring immediate supervision,
216 provided that a registered veterinary professional associate,
217 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist is subject to
218 s. 474.2126. However, the licensed veterinarian is responsible
219 for all such acts performed under this subsection by persons
220 under her or his supervision.
221
222 For the purposes of chapters 465 and 893, persons exempt
223 pursuant to subsection (1), subsection (2), or subsection (4)
224 are deemed to be duly licensed practitioners authorized by the
225 laws of this state to prescribe drugs or medicinal supplies.
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
226 Section 6. Section 474.204, Florida Statutes, is amended
227 to read:
228 474.204 Board of Veterinary Medicine.—
229 (1) To carry out the provisions of this chapter, there is
230 created within the department the Board of Veterinary Medicine
231 composed consisting of all of the following seven members, who
232 shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by
233 the Senate:.
234 (a)(2) Five members of the board who are shall be licensed
235 veterinarians.
236 (b) Two members who are registered with the department as
237 a veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or
238 veterinary technologist and who have been employed as such for
239 at least 5 years immediately preceding the date of appointment
240 to the board.
241 (c) Two members of the board who are shall be laypersons
242 who are not and have never been veterinarians or members of any
243 closely related profession or occupation.
244 (2)(3) All provisions of chapter 455 relating to
245 activities of regulatory boards shall apply.
246 Section 7. Section 474.2126, Florida Statutes, is created
247 to read:
248 474.2126 Veterinary professional associates, veterinary
249 technicians, and veterinary technologists; registration.—
250 (1) REGISTRATION.—
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
251 (a) A veterinary professional associate, veterinary
252 technician, or veterinary technologist may apply to the
253 department for registration by submitting a form prescribed by
254 the board. The department shall consider for registration each
255 qualified veterinary professional associate, veterinary
256 technician, or veterinary technologist, or applicant who the
257 department verifies has submitted a completed application and
258 meets the applicable requirements of this subsection.
259 (b) The department shall issue a certificate of
260 registration to each veterinary professional associate,
261 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist applicant who
262 the department verifies has graduated from the relevant
263 accredited program and received a passing score on the relevant
264 professional national competency examination approved by the
265 board.
266 (c) The department shall issue a certificate of
267 registration to an veterinary technician who does not meet the
268 requirements of paragraph (b), if he or she:
269 1. Submits a notarized document from an employer who is a
270 licensed veterinarian certifying that as of January 1, 2000, the
271 applicant possesses 5 or more years of practical experience
272 performing the tasks of a veterinary technician in this state;
273 2. Provides proof of graduation from a veterinary
274 technology program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical
275 Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
276 Activities before January 1, 2000; and
277 3. Is in good standing with the appropriate Florida
278 certifying body, including the Florida Veterinary Technician
279 Association or the Florida Veterinary Medical Association, is
280 eligible to apply for registration.
281 (d) The department shall make the list of registrants
282 available to the public on its website.
283 (e) The department may suspend the registration of any
284 veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or
285 veterinary technologist who the board determines has caused
286 serious harm to an animal due to negligence, incompetence, or
287 misconduct related to duties performed under this section and in
288 a manner inconsistent with the supervising veterinarian's
289 specific direction, until which time as the registrant has
290 completed remedial training or education directed by the board.
291 (f) The department may rescind the registration of any
292 veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or
293 veterinary technologist who is convicted of animal cruelty or
294 animal fighting under s. 828.12 or s. 828.122.
295 (2) PROHIBITION.—An individual may not hold himself or
296 herself out as a registered veterinary professional associate,
297 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist or use the
298 abbreviation RVT, RVTg, VT, VPA, or MVCC or in any other way
299 represent himself or herself as a veterinary professional
300 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
301 unless he or she has a valid certificate of registration from
302 the department.
303 (3) DUTIES AND ACTIONS OF A REGISTERED VETERINARY
304 TECHNICIAN OR VETERINARY TECHNOLOGIST.—
305 (a) Unless otherwise prohibited by this section or other
306 state or federal law, a registered veterinary technician or
307 veterinary technologist may perform duties or actions in which
308 he or she is competent and has the necessary training, current
309 knowledge, and experience to provide, as delegated under the
310 responsible supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed
311 veterinarian or registered veterinary professional associate. In
312 addition to other duties or actions approved by the supervising
313 veterinarian, a registered veterinary technician or veterinary
314 technologist may perform all the following actions under the
315 responsible supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed
316 veterinarian or a veterinary professional associate as delegated
317 by a licensed veterinarian:
318 1. Administer medical drugs as defined in chapter 465
319 prescribed for a patient by the supervising veterinarian, or
320 provide treatments, as directed;
321 2. Prepare, record, and administer vaccinations and
322 microchips; or
323 3. Perform humane euthanasia of animals and prepare, log,
324 and administer controlled substances for the purpose of
325 analgesia, anesthesia, or humane euthanasia, as delegated by a
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
326 licensed veterinarian and performed under responsible
327 supervision.
328 (b) Except as otherwise authorized by this section or
329 other state law, a registered veterinary technician or
330 veterinary technologist may not perform any of the following
331 actions:
332 1. Make or provide any diagnosis or prognosis;
333 2. Perform any surgery, except that a registered
334 veterinary technician or registered veterinary technologist may
335 perform suturing or stapling of skin lacerations, gingival
336 incisions, or existing surgical incisions or tooth extraction
337 procedures; or
338 3. Prescribe any medical drugs as defined in chapter 465
339 or controlled substances as defined in chapter 893.
340 (4) DUTIES AND ACTIONS OF A REGISTERED VETERINARY
341 PROFESSIONAL ASSOCIATE.—
342 (a) Unless otherwise prohibited by this section or other
343 state or federal law, a registered veterinary professional
344 associate may engage in the practice of veterinary medicine as
345 defined in s. 474.202 or veterinary medicine as defined in s.
346 474.202, to the extent that he or she is competent and has the
347 necessary training, current knowledge, and experience to provide
348 such care, as delegated under the responsible supervision, as
349 defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed veterinarian.
350 (b) A registered veterinary professional associate may not
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
351 do any of the following:
352 1. Prescribe a controlled substance listed in s. 893.03,
353 except that a registered veterinary professional associate may
354 perform humane euthanasia and prepare, log, and administer
355 controlled substances for the purpose of analgesia, anesthesia,
356 or humane euthanasia, as delegated by a licensed veterinarian
357 and performed under responsible supervision.
358 2. Perform a surgical procedure, except that a veterinary
359 professional associate may perform the following surgical
360 procedures:
361 a. Orchiectomy;
362 b. Veterinary dental surgery; or
363 c. Veterinary suturing or stapling of skin lacerations,
364 gingival incisions, or existing surgical incisions.
365 (5) ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICATION.—An individual who is not
366 registered with the state as a veterinary professional
367 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist may
368 administer medication prescribed by the supervising veterinarian
369 for a patient or render auxiliary or supporting assistance only
370 under the immediate supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a
371 licensed veterinarian or under the immediate supervision of a
372 registered veterinary professional associate, veterinary
373 technician, or veterinary technologist who is acting under the
374 responsible supervision of a licensed veterinarian or his or her
375 delegee as defined in s. 474.202, as provided for in subsection
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
376 (6). This section does not prohibit an individual from rendering
377 lifesaving aid and treatment to an animal in the absence of a
378 veterinarian if the animal is in a life-threatening condition
379 and requires immediate treatment to sustain life or prevent
380 further injury.
381 (6) DELEGATION.—Unless otherwise prohibited under this
382 section or other state law or federal law, a supervising
383 licensed veterinarian may in his or her judgment delegate to a
384 registered veterinary professional associate, veterinary
385 technician, or veterinary technologist the responsibility of
386 supervising a task or tasks performed by a veterinary assistant.
387 (7) LIABILITY.—A supervising licensed veterinarian is
388 liable for any acts or omissions of the registered veterinary
389 professional associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary
390 technologist acting under the licensed veterinarian's
391 supervision and control.
392 Section 8. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection
393 (3) of section 828.30, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
394 828.30 Rabies vaccination of dogs, cats, and ferrets.—
395 (1)(a) All dogs, cats, and ferrets 4 months of age or
396 older must be vaccinated by a licensed veterinarian or a person
397 authorized under paragraph (b) or s. 474.2126 against rabies
398 with a vaccine that is licensed by the United States Department
399 of Agriculture for use in those species.
400 (3) Upon vaccination against rabies, the licensed
Page 16 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 805 2026
401 veterinarian shall provide the animal's owner and the animal
402 control authority with a rabies vaccination certificate. Each
403 animal control authority and veterinarian shall use the "Rabies
404 Vaccination Certificate" of the National Association of State
405 Public Health Veterinarians (NASPHV) or an equivalent form
406 approved by the local government that contains all the
407 information required by the NASPHV Rabies Vaccination
408 Certificate. The veterinarian who administers the rabies
409 vaccination or who supervises the administration of the rabies
410 vaccination as provided in paragraph (1)(b) or s. 474.2126 to an
411 animal as authorized under this section may affix his or her
412 signature stamp in lieu of an actual signature.
413 Section 9. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 17 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb805-00